Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1344.
Disqualifications.

An individual shall be disqualified for benefits:

For not more than 15 weeks nor less than six weeks immediately following the filing of a claim for benefits (in addition to the waiting period) as may be determined by the Commissioner according to the circumstances in each case, if the Commissioner finds that:

he or she has been discharged by his or her last employing unit for misconduct connected with his or her work; or

he or she was separated from his or her last employing unit because he or she became unable to perform all or an essential part of his or her normal duties in such employment without good cause attributable to such employing unit because of the consequences that flow from his or her conviction of a felony or misdemeanor or from an action or order of a judge or court in any criminal or civil matter. In the event a conviction or the action or order of any judge or court in any criminal or civil matter is rescinded or expunged, the individual may be eligible for benefits from the time the individual would have otherwise been eligible for benefits.

For any week benefits are claimed, except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, until he or she has presented evidence to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that he or she has performed services in employment for a bona fide employer and has had earnings in excess of six times his or her weekly benefit amount if the Commissioner finds that such individual is unemployed because:

He or she has left the employ of his or her last employing unit voluntarily without good cause attributable to such employing unit. An individual shall not suffer more than one disqualification by reason of such separation. However, an individual shall not be disqualified for benefits if the individual left such employment to accompany a spouse who:

is on active duty with the U.S. Armed Forces and is required to relocate due to permanent change of station orders, activation orders, or unit deployment orders, and when such relocation would make it impractical or impossible, as determined by the Commissioner, for the individual to continue working for such employing unit; or

holds a commission in the U.S. Foreign Service and is assigned overseas, and when such relocation would make it impractical or impossible, as determined by the Commissioner, for the individual to continue working for such employing unit.

He or she has been discharged by his or her last employing unit for gross misconduct connected with his or her work. As used in this section, “gross misconduct” means conduct directly related to the employee’s work performance that demonstrates a flagrant, wanton, and intentional disregard of the employer’s business interest, and that has direct and significant impact upon the employer’s business interest, including theft, fraud, intoxication, intentional serious damage to property, intentional infliction of personal injury, any conduct that constitutes a felony, or repeated incidents after written warning of either unprovoked insubordination or public use of profanity. An individual shall not suffer more than one disqualification by reason of such separation.

He or she has failed, without good cause, either to apply for available, suitable work when so directed by the employment office or the Commissioner, or to accept suitable work when offered him or her, or has during the course of a job interview for available employment made verbal statements that are either untrue, show an unreasonable lack of interest, or are calculated to preclude an offer of work or a directive being made, or to return to his or her customary self-employment, if any, when so directed by the Commissioner. An individual shall not suffer more than one disqualification for these causes.

In determining whether or not any work or employment is suitable for an individual for purposes of this subdivision, the Commissioner shall consider the degree of risk involved to his or her health, safety, and morals, his or her physical fitness and prior training, his or her experience and prior earnings, his or her length of unemployment and prospects for securing local work in his or her customary occupation, and the distance of the available work from his or her residence.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no work shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied under this chapter to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:

if the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other dispute;

if the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality;

if, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because:
(F) (i) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because:

he or she is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974,

19 U.S.C. § 2296(a)

;

nor shall such individual be denied benefits with respect to any week in which he or she is in such approved training by reason of leaving work to enter such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, as defined in section 236(e) of the Trade Act of 1974,

19 U.S.C. § 2296(e)

; or

because of the application to any such week in training of provisions in this law (or any federal unemployment insurance law administered by this agency), relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work.

Provided that, benefits paid to an eligible claimant regularly attending a training course approved under the Trade Act of 1974,

19 U.S.C. § 2296(e)

, following a refusal of work, or leaving of unsuitable work, shall not be charged against the experience-rating record of any employer, but shall be charged to the Fund.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

For not more than six weeks nor less than one week immediately following the filing of a claim for benefits (in addition to the waiting period) as may be determined by the Commissioner according to the circumstances in each case, if the Commissioner finds that he or she has left the employ of his or her last employing unit, without good cause attributable to such employing unit, because of a health condition, as certified by a health care provider, as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9432(9)

, which precludes the discharge of duties inherent in such employment.

For any week with respect to which the Commissioner finds that his or her total or partial unemployment is due to a stoppage of work that exists because of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which he or she is or was last employed, provided that this subdivision shall not apply if:

the individual is not participating in or financing or directly interested in the labor dispute that caused the stoppage of work; or

the stoppage of work was due solely to a lockout, effected by the employer in order to gain some concession from employees. A lockout does not include a temporary suspension of work in response to:

actual or imminent damage to property of the employer; or

a purposeful effort by employees to reduce productivity.

For any week with respect to which the individual is receiving or has received remuneration in the form of:

wages in lieu of notice; or

vacation pay or holiday pay, provided that:

Vacation pay due at time of separation in accordance with a work agreement (whether a formal contract or established custom) shall be allocated to the period immediately following separation, or if due subsequent to separation, it shall be allocated to the week in which due or the next following week, and that number of weeks immediately following as required to equal the total of the weeks of pay due. Any mutual agreement between the employer and employee(s)(whether or not payment is made), allocating such remuneration to any period during which work is performed, within four weeks prior to the date of separation, shall not be valid for the purpose of determining unemployment compensation entitlement or waiting period credit purposes and such payment shall be allocated to the period immediately following separation.

There shall be no disqualification amount for any holiday.

Severance pay, back pay awards, and back pay settlements. These payments, awards, and settlements shall be allocated to the week(s) and in the manner as specified in the order or agreement, or, in the absence of such specificity, to the week(s) and in the manner that, in the judgment of the Commissioner, would be reasonable.

Compensation for temporary partial disability or temporary total disability under the workers’ compensation law of any state or under a similar law of the United States.

A pension (which shall include a governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar periodic payment) under a plan maintained or contributed to by a base period or chargeable employer. The weekly benefit amount payable to such individual for such week shall be reduced (but not below zero):
(E) (i) A pension (which shall include a governmental or other pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or any other similar periodic payment) under a plan maintained or contributed to by a base period or chargeable employer. The weekly benefit amount payable to such individual for such week shall be reduced (but not below zero):

by the entire prorated weekly amount of the pension if no contributions to the plan were made by the individual;

by no part of the pension if the entire contributions to the plan were provided by such individual, or by the individual and an employer (or any other person or organization); or

by no part of the pension if the services performed by the individual during the base period (or remuneration received for such services) for such employer did not affect the individual’s eligibility for, or increase the amount of, such pension, retirement or retired pay, annuity, or similar payment.

Provided that if such remuneration specified in this subdivision, (after applying the provisions of this subdivision) is less than the benefits that would otherwise be due under this chapter, he or she shall be entitled to receive for such week, if otherwise eligible, benefits reduced by the amount of such remuneration (after applying the provisions of this subdivision) after rounding such remuneration to the next higher dollar and the provisions of subdivision 1301(9) and sections 1338a and 1339 of this title do not apply.

[Repealed.]

For any week with respect to which or a part of which he or she has received or is seeking to receive unemployment benefits under an unemployment compensation law of another state or of the United States, provided that if the appropriate agency of such other state or of the United States finally determines that he or she is not entitled to such unemployment benefits, this disqualification shall not apply.

In periods of “high level unemployment” an individual shall be disqualified for benefits for not more than 12 nor less than six consecutive weeks immediately following the filing of a claim for benefits, as may be determined by the Commissioner according to the circumstances, when it is found that he or she would otherwise be disqualified under the provisions of subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, and except that the disqualification provided by this subdivision shall terminate if an individual has performed service in any employment as provided by subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any individual who has been disqualified for regular or extended benefits pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(3) of this section shall not be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period unless the individual has been employed after the beginning date of such disqualification and has earned in excess of four times the individual’s weekly benefit amount.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 236

;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1971, No. 77

, § 8, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1973, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 15, 1974;

1973, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1977, No. 64

, §§ 18, 19, 25(b);

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. March 31, 1980;

1981, No. 86

, §§ 3, 6, 13;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 1982;

1983, No. 16

, § 11, eff. April 4, 1983;

1987, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.);

1989, No. 62

;

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4-6;

1999, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 2011;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2017, No. 74

, § 52;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. March 30, 2020;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. Oct. 1, 2021;

2021, No. 20

, § 222.

§ 1345.
Repealed.
1971, No. 77, § 8, eff. Dec. 31, 1971.

§ 1346.
Claims for benefits; rules; notice.

Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with rules adopted by the Board.

Every person making a claim shall certify that he or she has not, during the week with respect to which waiting period credit or benefits are claimed, earned or received wages or other remuneration for any employment, whether subject to this chapter or not, otherwise than as specified in his or her claim. All benefits shall be paid in accordance with the rules adopted by the Board.

An employer shall post notice of how an unemployed individual can seek unemployment benefits in a form provided by the Commissioner in a place conspicuous to individuals performing services for the employer. The notice shall also advise individuals of their rights under the Domestic and Sexual Violence Survivor’s Transitional Employment Program, established pursuant to chapter 16A of this title. The Commissioner shall provide a copy of the notice to an employer upon request without cost to the employer.
(c) (1) An employer shall post notice of how an unemployed individual can seek unemployment benefits in a form provided by the Commissioner in a place conspicuous to individuals performing services for the employer. The notice shall also advise individuals of their rights under the Domestic and Sexual Violence Survivor’s Transitional Employment Program, established pursuant to chapter 16A of this title. The Commissioner shall provide a copy of the notice to an employer upon request without cost to the employer.

An employer shall provide an individual with notification of the availability of unemployment compensation at the time of the individual’s separation from employment. The notification may be based on model notification language provided by the U.S. Secretary of Labor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1973, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 15, 1974;

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Feb. 20, 2020;

2019, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. March 30, 2020.

§ 1347.
Nondisclosure or misrepresentation.

Any person who fails, without good cause, to make reasonable effort to secure suitable work when directed to do so by the employment office or the Commissioner and has received any amount as benefits under this chapter with respect to weeks for which the person is determined to be ineligible for such failure, and any person who by nondisclosure or misrepresentation by him or her, or by another, of a material fact (irrespective of whether such nondisclosure or misrepresentation was known or fraudulent) has received any amount as benefits under this chapter while any conditions for the receipt of benefits imposed by this chapter were not fulfilled in his or her case or while he or she was disqualified from receiving benefits, shall be liable for such amount. Notice of determination in such cases shall specify that the person is liable to repay to the Fund the amount of overpaid benefits, the basis of the overpayment, and the week or weeks for which such benefits were paid. The determination shall be made within three years from the date of such overpayment.

Any person who receives remuneration described in subdivision 1344(a)(5) of this title that is allocable in whole or in part to prior weeks during which he or she received any amounts as benefits under this chapter shall be liable for all such amounts of benefits or those portions of such amounts equal to the portions of such remuneration properly allocable to the weeks in question. Notice of determination in such cases shall specify that the person is liable to repay to the Fund the amount of overpaid benefits, the basis of the overpayment, and the week or weeks for which such benefits were paid. The determination shall be made within three years from the date of such overpayment or within one year from the date of receipt of the remuneration, whichever period is longer.

The person liable under this section shall repay such amount to the Commissioner for the Fund. In addition to the repayment, if the Commissioner finds that a person intentionally misrepresented or failed to disclose a material fact with respect to his or her claim for benefits, the person shall pay an additional penalty of 15 percent of the amount of the overpaid benefits. Any additional penalty amount collected shall be deposited in the Fund. Such amount may be collectible by civil action in the Superior Court, in the name of the Commissioner.

In any case in which under this section a person is liable to repay any amount to the Commissioner for the Fund, the Commissioner may withhold, in whole or in part, any future benefits payable to such person, and credit such withheld benefits against the amount due from such person until it is repaid in full, less any penalties assessed under subsection (c) of this section.

In addition to the foregoing, when it is found by the Commissioner that a person intentionally misrepresented or failed to disclose a material fact with respect to his or her claim for benefits and in the event the person is not prosecuted under section 1368 of this title and penalty provided in section 1373 of this title is not imposed, the person shall be disqualified and shall not be entitled to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled after the determination for such number of weeks not exceeding 26 as the Commissioner shall deem just. The notice of determination shall also specify the period of disqualification imposed hereunder.

Interested parties shall have the right to appeal from any determination under this section and the same procedure shall be followed as provided for in subsection 1348(a) and section 1349 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1965, No. 74

, eff. May 26, 1965;

1969, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 15, 1974;

1981, No. 86

, § 14, eff. May 10, 1981;

1987, No. 100

, § 3;

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1995, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.2;

2013, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § E.400.1;

2017, No. 74

, § 53.

§ 1348.
Procedure.

An authorized representative of the Commissioner shall pass upon each claim for benefits as provided in this chapter and shall, after such filing, promptly award such benefits as shall be found to be payable under the provisions of this chapter. Prompt notice in writing of the determination of such representative and reasons therefor in respect to such claim shall be given to the claimant, his or her last employer, all other interested parties, and the Commissioner. Any interested party may, within 30 days after notice thereof, file an appeal from the determination with an appeals referee employed by the Commissioner. Such appeal shall, after notice to the claimant, his or her last employer, and all other interested parties, be heard at a place as convenient to the parties as, in the judgment of the referee, is practical, within 30 days after such appeal is filed with the referee; after the hearing the determination shall be sustained, modified, or set aside by the referee as may be warranted. Prompt notice in writing of the decision of the referee and the reasons therefor shall be given.

The authorized representative of the Commissioner may, for good cause, at any time within one year after date of the original determination, reconsider an award of benefits or the denial of a claim therefor, and may issue a redetermination which may award, terminate, continue, increase, or decrease such benefits. Such redetermination shall not affect any benefits paid before the date thereof under authority of the prior determination in the absence of nondisclosure or misrepresentation of a material fact. Prompt notice in writing of such redetermination and the reasons therefor shall be given to the claimant, his or her last employer, and all other interested parties any of whom shall have the same right to appeal and the same procedure shall be followed as provided for in case of appeal from the original determination.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 117

;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1965, No. 66

, eff. May 19, 1965;

1989, No. 8

, § 7.

§ 1349.
Appeals to Board; Supreme Court appeal.

Within 30 days after date thereof, an interested party may appeal from the decision of the referee to the Board, by filing a written request therefor in the manner prescribed by regulations of the Board.
The appeal shall be heard by the Board after notice to the claimant and his or her last employer, within a reasonable time after notice of the appeal is filed, and the Board may affirm, modify, or reverse the decision of the referee solely on the basis of evidence in the record transferred to it by the referee, or upon the basis of evidence in the record and such additional evidence as it may direct to be taken.
Upon motion made by the Commissioner, a review may be initiated by the Board of a decision of the referee or a benefit determination.
The Board shall make its findings of fact and conclusions thereon.
Prompt notice of the findings of fact, ruling of law, conclusions, and decision of the Board shall be given as hereinabove provided.
The decision shall be final unless an appeal to the Supreme Court is taken.
Testimony given at any hearing upon a disputed claim shall be recorded, but the record need not be transcribed unless ordered.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 11, eff. July 11, 1961;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 196, eff. March 29, 1972;

1989, No. 8

, § 8.

§ 1350.
Interested party disqualified on behalf of Commissioner.

A person shall not participate on behalf of the Commissioner in any case in which he or she is an interested party.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1351.
Procedure.

The manner in which disputed claims shall be presented and the conduct of hearings before the Commissioner, a referee, and the Board shall be governed by suitable rules and regulations established by the Board.
The Commissioner, the referee, and the Board shall not be bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure except as provided in this chapter, but may conduct a hearing or trial in such manner as to ascertain the substantial rights of the parties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 12, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1352.
Witnesses; fees.

In the discharge of his or her duties prescribed by this chapter, any member of the Board, a referee, and any authorized agent of the Commissioner shall have power to administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, and by subpoena compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, documents, and records, necessary and material to be used in connection with any disputed claim.
Witnesses summoned by a member of the Board, a referee, or an agent of the Commissioner in proceedings within this section shall be paid the same fees as witnesses summoned to appear before a Criminal Division of the Superior Court in civil causes.
Such fees shall be paid out of the Vermont Employment Security Board Administration Fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 13, eff. July 11, 1961;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 75, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 1353.
Collateral use prohibited.

Any determination, redetermination, finding of fact, conclusion of law, decision, final order, or final judgment entered or made by a claims adjudicator or other authorized representative of the Commissioner, an appeals referee, the Employment Security Board, or a court of competent jurisdiction in any type of proceeding under this chapter is binding only between the Department and all parties in that proceeding and is not binding, conclusive, or admissible in any separate or subsequent action between an individual and his or her present or former employer brought before an arbitrator, court, or judge of this State or of the United States, regardless of whether the prior proceeding was between the same or related parties or involved the same facts.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§§ 1354,
1355.
Repealed.
1961, No. 210, § 17, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1356.
Limitation of fees.

An individual shall not be charged fees of any kind by the Commissioner or his or her representatives, a referee, or the Board in any proceeding under this chapter.
An individual claiming benefits in any such proceeding may be represented by counsel or other authorized agent; but no such counsel or agents shall together charge or receive for such services from any individual more than 10 percent of the maximum benefits at issue in such proceedings or court action, except as the Board or the court may allow in exceptional circumstances.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 14, eff. July 11, 1961;

1965, No. 75

, § 1, eff. May 26, 1965.

§ 1357.
Notices; form and service.

Notices required under the provisions of this chapter, unless otherwise provided herein or by rules of court promulgated by the Supreme Court, shall be deemed sufficient if given in writing and delivered to the person entitled thereto by an agent of the Commissioner, or sent by ordinary or certified mail to the last address of the person appearing upon the records of the Commissioner. The manner of service shall be certified by the agent of the Commissioner making the service.
Regardless of the manner of service, appeal periods shall commence to run from the date of the determination or decision rendered.
In the event that a person to whom a notice has been sent files with the Commissioner within 60 days from date of said notice a sworn statement to the effect that the notice was not received, or if the Commissioner is satisfied that the addressee did not receive the notice, a new notice shall be sent to that person and the appeal period shall commence to run from the date on which the new notice is sent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 197, eff. March 29, 1972;

1987, No. 100

, § 4;

1989, No. 8

, § 9;

1991, No. 82

, § 7.

§ 1358.
Unemployment Compensation Fund; establishment and control.

There is hereby established as a special fund, to be kept separate and apart from all other public monies or funds of this State, an Unemployment Compensation Fund, which shall be administered by the Commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this chapter.
This Fund shall consist of (1) all contributions collected under this chapter; (2) interest earned upon any monies in the Fund; (3) any property or securities acquired through the use of monies belonging to the Fund; (4) all earnings of such property or securities; (5) all money credited to this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to section 903 of the Social Security Act as amended; and (6) all other monies received for the Fund from any other source.
All monies in the Fund shall be mingled and undivided.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1967, No. 190

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967.

§ 1359.
Administration of Unemployment Compensation Fund.

The Fund shall be administered in trust and used solely to pay benefits and refunds upon vouchers drawn on the Fund by the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter and to such rules as the Board is authorized to adopt, except that money credited to this State’s account under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in subsection (b) of this section. There shall be maintained within the Fund three separate fund accounts: (1) a clearing account; (2) an Unemployment Trust Fund account; and (3) a benefit account. All monies payable to the Fund upon receipt thereof shall be immediately deposited in the clearing account, and, after clearance thereof, shall, except that the monies may be expended for the payment of refunds under this chapter, be deposited immediately with the U.S. Secretary of the Treasury to the credit of the Unemployment Trust Fund account of the State of Vermont in the Unemployment Trust Fund established and maintained pursuant to the act of Congress designated as the Social Security Act, as amended. The Commissioner shall requisition from the Vermont Unemployment Trust Fund account such amounts from time to time as are necessary for and to be used solely in the payment of benefits and refunds under this chapter. The requisitioned sums shall be deposited in the benefit account. Any monies so withdrawn shall not be used for expenses of administration or any purpose other than the payment of benefits and refunds under this chapter. Requirements with respect to specific appropriation or other formal release by State officers of monies belonging to the State shall not be applicable to withdrawals from the Fund.

Money credited to the account of this State in the Unemployment Trust Fund by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America under section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended:

may not be requisitioned from this State’s account or used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter. Such money may be requisitioned under subsection (a) of this section for the payment of benefits. That money may also be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this chapter but only under a specific appropriation by the Legislature and only if the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law which:

specifies the purpose for which the money is appropriated and the amount appropriated therefor;

limits the period within which the money may be obligated to a period ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment of the appropriation law; and

limits the amount which may be obligated during any 12-month period beginning on July 1 and ending on the next June 30, including the 12-month period which began on July 1, 1968 and ends on June 30, 1969, to an amount which does not exceed the amount by which:

the aggregate of the amounts credited to the account of this State under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, during the same 12-month period and the 14 preceding 12-month periods, exceeds

the aggregate of the amount obligated for administration and paid out for benefits and charged against the amounts credited to the account of this State during those 15 12-month periods.

which is obligated for administration or paid out for benefits shall be charged against equivalent amounts which were first credited and which are not already so charged; except that no amount obligated for administration during a 12-month period specified herein may be charged against any amount credited during such a 12-month period earlier than the 14th preceding such period. Amounts credited to this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund under Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, which has been appropriated for expenses of administration shall be excluded from the Unemployment Compensation Fund balance for the purposes of section 1326 of this title.

Money appropriated as provided herein for the payment of expenses of administration shall be requisitioned as needed for the payment of obligations incurred under the appropriation and, upon requisition, shall be deposited in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund from which those payments shall be made. Money so deposited shall, until expended, remain a part of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and, if it will not be expended, shall be returned promptly to the account of this State in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1967, No. 190

, § 2, eff. April 17, 1967;

1969, No. 77

, eff. April 18, 1969;

2015, No. 23

, § 120.

§ 1360.
Treasurer.

The Commissioner shall designate a treasurer of the Fund, who shall pay all vouchers duly drawn upon the Fund, in such manner as the Commissioner may prescribe.
He or she shall have custody of all monies belonging to the Fund and not otherwise held or deposited or invested pursuant to this chapter.
The treasurer shall give bond conditioned on the faithful performance of his or her duties as treasurer of the Fund in an amount specified by the Commissioner and approved by the Governor.
All premiums upon bonds required pursuant to this section when furnished by an authorized surety company shall be paid from the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.
The treasurer shall deposit the monies constituting the Fund, under the supervision and control of the Commissioner, according to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1361.
Management of Funds upon discontinuance of Unemployment Trust Fund.

The provisions of sections 1358-1360 of this title to the extent that they relate to the Unemployment Trust Fund, shall be operative only so long as such Unemployment Trust Fund continues to exist and so long as the Secretary of the Treasury continues to maintain for this State a separate book account of all Funds deposited therein by this State for benefit purposes, together with this State’s proportionate share of the earnings of such Unemployment Trust Fund, from which only the Commissioner of Labor is permitted to make withdrawals.
If and when such Unemployment Trust Fund shall no longer be required by the laws of the United States to be maintained as aforesaid as a condition of approval of this chapter as provided in Title III of the Social Security Act, then all monies, properties, or securities therein, belonging to the Unemployment Compensation Fund of this State, shall be transferred to the treasurer of the Unemployment Compensation Fund, who shall hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and release such monies, properties, or securities in a manner approved by the Commissioner and appropriate for trust funds, subject to all claims for benefits under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1362.
Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund.

There is hereby created the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund to consist of all monies received by the State or by the Commissioner for the administration of this chapter.
This special fund shall be handled through the State Treasurer as other State monies are handled, but it shall be expended solely for the purposes and in the amounts found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for the proper and efficient administration of such chapter and its balance shall not lapse at any time but shall remain continuously available to the Commissioner for expenditures consistent herewith.
All federal monies allotted or apportioned to the State by the Secretary of Labor, or other agency, for the administration of this chapter shall be paid into the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund and are hereby appropriated to such Fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1362a.
[Repealed.]

§ 1363.
Expenditures.

All monies made available by or received by the State for the State employment service, as provided in chapter 15 of this title, shall be paid to and expended from the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund, and a special employment service account shall be maintained for that purpose as a part of said Fund.
For the purpose of establishing and maintaining free public employment offices, the Commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with the Railroad Retirement Board or any other agency of the United States charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law, with any political subdivision of this State or with any private, nonprofit organization, and as a part of any such agreement, the Commissioner may accept monies, services, or quarters as a contribution to the employment service account.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.). § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.